apertium-mar.mar.dix
		<pardef n="/दे__vblex">
			<e> 		<p><l>देण</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><j/></r></p><par n="__inf_endings"/></e>	

			<e> 		<p><l>दे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>द्या</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देऊया</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">  <p><l>देऊयात</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="hort"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>द्यायला</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>         <p><l>देऊ</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="incp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देत</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देतो</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देते</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देतो</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देतोस</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देतेस</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देता</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देतो</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देते</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देते</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देतात</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>दिला</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>दिली</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>दिले</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>दिलं</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>दिलेत</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>दिले</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>दिल्या</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>दिल्यात</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>दिली</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>दिलीत</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e> 		<p><l>देईन</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देऊ</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देशील</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>द्याल</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देईल</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>देतील</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>देणार</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="pros"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- habitual -->
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचो</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r='LR'>	<p><l>द्यायचा</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायची</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचो</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायच्या</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचा</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायचास</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायची</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायचीस</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचा</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायचात</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायचेत</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायच्या</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायच्यात</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचा</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायची</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यायचं</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायचे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायच्या</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>			<p><l>द्यायची</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="hab"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- subjunctive -->
			<e>       	<p><l>द्यावा</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>द्यावी</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>द्यावे</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>द्यावेत</l><r>देणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

		<e lm="देणे"> 					<i></i><par n="/दे__vblex" /></e>
